New York, session 2025-2026, S2515.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 2807-m of the public health law, 2 as amended by section 6 of part Y of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 12. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, applications 5 submitted on or after April first, two thousand sixteen, for the physi- 6 cian loan repayment program pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision 7 five-a of this section and subdivision ten of this section or the physi- 8 cian practice support program pursuant to paragraph (d) of subdivision 9 five-a of this section, shall be subject to the following changes: 10 (a) Awards shall be made from the total funding available for new 11 awards under the physician loan repayment program and the physician 12 practice support program, with neither program limited to a specific 13 funding amount within such total funding available; 14 (b) An applicant may apply for an award for either physician loan 15 repayment or physician practice support, but not both, except as 16 provided under paragraph (e) of this subdivision; 17 (c) An applicant shall agree to practice for three years in an under- 18 served area and each award shall provide up to forty thousand dollars 19 for each of the three years; [and] 20 (d) To the extent practicable, awards shall be timed to be of use for 21 job offers made to applicants; and 22 (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subdivision, an applicant 23 specializing in geriatric care may be eligible and apply for an award 24 for both physician loan repayment and physician practice support, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06837-01-5 S. 2515 2 1 provided that such applicant agrees to specialize in geriatric care for 2 at least five years. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 4 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 5 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 6 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 7 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.